test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: nátt
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: nátt
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: nátt
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: náttar
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: nætur
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: [nætrum, náttum]
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: nátta
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: náttin
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: náttina
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: náttini
    nátt+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: náttarinnar
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: næturnar
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: náttunum
    nátt+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: náttanna
